Utah statutes.
58-26a-301.   Licensure or registration required -- License and registration classifications.

(1) (a)  A license is required for an individual to engage in the practice of public accounting, except as specifically provided in Section 58-26a-305 or 58-1-307.

(b)  Registration with the division is required for a qualified business entity to engage in the practice of public accounting, except as specifically provided in Section 58-26a-305 or 58-1-307.

(2) (a)  The division shall issue to an individual who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of Certified Public Accountant.

(b)  The division shall issue to a qualified business entity which qualifies under this chapter a registration in the classification of Certified Public Accountant Firm.



Enacted by Chapter 261, 2000 General Session

